District of Columbia statutes.
18-304

Devise of land to include leaseholds.

A devise of the land of a testator, or of his land in any place, or in the occupation of a person named or otherwise described in a general manner, includes his leasehold estates or those to which the descriptions extend, as well as freehold estates, unless a contrary intention appears in the testamentary instrument containing the devise.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 688, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 18-304.
1973 Ed., § 18-304.